src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
# Adjective affixes

This file contains the morphology for the Inari Saami adjectives.

The morphophonological processes are governed by triggers. When there are more
triggers, tney must be ordered as follows (where {A,B} C means *A or B, thereafter C*):

{SV,ÁE,ÁI}  SC  FCD {WG,CSH} CLEN  {VHIGH,VBACK}  {RVSH,RLEN} EA {SLEN,SVSH}  SVLOW

## Adjectives with attr only

**LEXICON ATTR** for stems with only attribute form, gives Attr, svt. sends to Cmp.

## Even-syllable stems

**LEXICON SIAHA** for siähá. It gives only Attr and Sg/Pl Nom. Fix?

**LEXICON SKELMA** directing to X_ALGA, attr skelmâ

**LEXICON CEPPI** directing to X_AIGI, attr. čepis

**LEXICON UCCE** 

**LEXICON SUVRE** 

**LEXICON KUKKE** directing to X_ALGE, attr. kuhes

**LEXICON PASE** directing to X_NJUNE via HUMO_REST, attr. pase                  

**LEXICON HUMO** directing to X_NJUNE via HUMO_REST, attr. humos                  

**LEXICON HUMO_REST** 

**LEXICON UAMI** directing to X_SAAMI, attr. uá'mi

**LEXICON LAAMI** directing to X_SAAMI, attr. lämis

**LEXICON LAAMI_REST** 

**LEXICON PYERI** directing to X_KYELI, attr. pyeri

**LEXICON HYENI** se^RVl^RC directing to X_KYELI, attr. hyenes

**LEXICON NUORA** directing to X_KIELA, attr. nuora

## Odd-syllable stems

**LEXICON NJUORAS** directing to X_RUONAS, attr. njuorâs

**LEXICON UAMIS** directing to X_RUONAS, as an own group because of FCD, attr. uámi, čuámi, often used in compounds

**LEXICON HAANIS** directing to X_PAAVIR, attr. hänis

**LEXICON TIMES** directing to X_PAAVIR, attr. timmâ

**LEXICON KIARGUS_nocomp**  like HAANIS, directing to X_PAAVIR, 

**LEXICON HAAITIS** directing to X_VEESKIR, attr. rähis, not in use

**LEXICON HEEITUG** directing to X_PAAVIR, attr. heitugis, heitugâs

**LEXICON VAANIS** directing to  X_PAAVIR, attr. väni

**LEXICON NJAALGIS** directing to NJAALGIS_COMMON, Attr. njaalgâ and njälgis

**LEXICON RAAPIS** directing to NJAALGIS_COMMON, Attr. räpis 

**LEXICON NJAALGIS_COMMON** directing to  X_KAARBIS

**LEXICON KOSKES** directing to  X_VEESKIR, attr. koške

**LEXICON NJOLGES** directing to  X_VEESKIR, attr. njolges

**LEXICON FIIJNES**  no noun cont.lex with this pattern

**LEXICON KOOIDAS** directing to  X_VEESKIR, attr. koidâ

**LEXICON SUOTAS** directing to  X_VEESKIR, attr. suotâs

**LEXICON LIAGUS** like SUOTAS except for CSH

**LEXICON SENES** not fitting in X_PELES because of CSH attr. seŋes

**LEXICON KEPPIS** directing to X_LITTER, attr. keppâ

**LEXICON PASTEL** directing to X_LITTER, attr. pastelis; adj is PASTEL

**LEXICON FISKAD** directing to X_LITTER, attr. fiskis (fikâdis)

**LEXICON JUOLLAD** directing to X_EEMEED, attr, juolis, juolâdis, juolâdâs

**LEXICON A_LITTER** directing to X_LITTER

**LEXICON ALMOS** directing to X_SAJOS, attr. almos

**LEXICON MAGGAAR** as SOOHAD_NOCOMP, BUT WITHOUT ATTR.

**LEXICON SOOHAD_nocomp** directing to X_EEMEED, attr. sohâdis

**LEXICON SOOHAD** directing to X_EEMEED, attr. sohâdis

**LEXICON SOOHAD_NULLATTR** 

**LEXICON SOOHAD_NOATTR** 

**LEXICON MAAJEEB-COMP** comparative lexicon

**LEXICON PEEGGALM** directing to X_EEMEED, attr. sohâdis

**LEXICON JUARBUDEKES** 

**LEXICON JUARBUDEVES** 

**LEXICON JUARBUDEKES_INFL** 

LEXICON A_KOLME ad hoc three syllable stem > LITTER

**LEXICON KUBDUV** . It doesn't fit with KAAMUV because of kubduvân, kubduvist

**LEXICON KUBDUV_COMP** 

## Contracted stems

**LEXICON ALKKEE** directing to X_TAHHEE, attr. älkkees

**LEXICON A_IJJE** 

**LEXICON TTETTEE** 

**LEXICON PYECCEE** directing to X_TAHHEE, attr. pyeccee

**LEXICON ALKKEE_COMMON** common for ALKKEE and PYECCEE

**LEXICON A_KAANDAS** directing to X_KAANDAS, no attr, half congruence

**LEXICON A_TUULAS** directing to X_KAANDAS, no attr, half congruence

**LEXICON STYERES** directing to X_KAARBIS, attr. stuorrâ

**LEXICON RIGES** directing to X_KAARBIS, attr. riges, 3st comparision

**LEXICON MUOTTII** almost like KARRII, direct to it?

**LEXICON A_VUALAAS** 

**LEXICON SIAMMAS** 

**LEXICON JIAVTAS** 

**LEXICON TAASSAS** note táássáš itself is not here.

## 4 syll stems

**LEXICON A_KUNAGAS** directing to  X_KUNAGAS; syeligâs, is like kunâgâs but FCD is not enough to create the comparation

**LEXICON UANIHASJ** directing to LAS_SUF, attr, -âš

**LEXICON KIERDAVAS** 

**LEXICON UANIHASJ_INFL** 

**LEXICON UNOHAS** directing to LAS_SUF, attr, -is

**LEXICON ANOLASJ** directing to LAS_COMMON, attr, -âš
Adj - pooliitlâš: # attr. pooliitlâš; puolikongruenssi mahdollinen (#-paikat), puolikongr. asemesta SgNom.

**LEXICON LAGAN** directing to A_LITTER, attr. -lágán

**LEXICON MUSTOTTEM** pls note e > iä in sg ill; no comparation

**LEXICON A_INDECL** not all forms., attr = Sg. Nom.

**LEXICON OLMOOSMETTUM**, not all forms. attr. = Sg. Nom.

**LEXICON METTUMforms** 

## Der/Comp+Aarision

* **LEXICON COMPe** NUORA uses this lexicon

* **LEXICON VVCOMPe** ALKKEE uses this lexicon; giving älkkeb etc.

* **LEXICON COMPclen** NUORA uses this lexicon

* **LEXICON CCOMPe** STYERES and MUOTTII use this lexicon

* **LEXICON eCOMP**

* **LEXICON COMPo** NJUORAS, NJAALGIS uses this lexicon

* **LEXICON eCOMP-SUF** 

* **LEXICON oCOMP-SUF** 

* **LEXICON CCOMP-SUF**  STYERES uses this lexicon

* **LEXICON COMP-SUF** 

* **LEXICON VVCOMP-SUF** 

* **LEXICON COMP-SUFclen** 

* **LEXICON SUP_MUS**

* **LEXICON SUP_MUSJ** majemuš

* **LEXICON MUS**  asdf

* **LEXICON MUSj** SUP_MUSJ uses this lexicon, eg. majemuš

* **LEXICON CMUS**  STYERES uses this lexicon

* **LEXICON MOS**

* **LEXICON MUS-SUF**

* **LEXICON MUSj-SUF**

* **LEXICON CMUS-SUF**

**LEXICON P-COMP-ERR-ORTH** 

* **LEXICON A_VUOTA** for derivation

* **LEXICON FLAG_2KIELA** @C.NeedNoun@

* **LEXICON A_ADV** for derivation

* **LEXICON A_LAGAN** for derivation

**LEXICON A_LASJ** 

**LEXICON ATTR_R** sends to R, NAMAG, SAS, CMP_ADJ.

# Derivation

* **LEXICON NAMAG** gives »»» and directs to NAMAG, both from adj and numerals

* **LEXICON SAS** , both from adj and numerals

* **LEXICON NAMAGCont**

* **LEXICON SASCont** ,

* *LEXICON Gen_DER* 

* *LEXICON Nom_DER* 

* *LEXICON DER-AG* 

* *LEXICON DER-SAS* 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smn/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>

---
